South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4596.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (54) to the extent not already exempt pursuant to Section 12-37-250, for an individual who has reached the age of sixty-five years on or before December thirty-first, any increase in property tax owed from the time the individual reached the age of sixty-five years. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to property tax years after 2025. ----XX----